Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-101.08
Coordination of activities; duties.

The Department of Health and Human Services shall consult and cooperate with the Department of Correctional Services so as to coordinate in an effective manner the activities of the departments with those related activities affecting the welfare of persons which are the responsibility of the Department of Health and Human Services and the Department of Correctional Services.

Laws 1961, c. 416, § 7, p. 1266;

Laws 1973, LB 563, § 18;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 894;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 778.